trunk/apertium-hbs-eng/apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="ben/d__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ds</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cut__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bestr/ide__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ide</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ide</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ides</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ode</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>idden</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iding</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iding</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iding</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ake</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ake</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>akes</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ook</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aken</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aking</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aking</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aking</l>        <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="f/ind__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ind</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ind</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inds</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ound</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ound</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inding</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inding</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inding</l>        <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="b/ite__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ite</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ite</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ites</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>it</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>itten</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iting</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iting</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>iting</l>        <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ble/ed__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eds</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eding</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eding</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eding</l>        <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bles/s__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ses</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>st</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>sed</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>st</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>sed</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>sing</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>sing</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>sing</l>        <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bl/ow__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ow</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ows</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ew</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>own</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>owing</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>owing</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>owing</l>        <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="grow close"><i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>close</l><r><g><b/>close</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take into account"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>account</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>account</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="set fire"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>fire</l><r><g><b/>fire</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="put on"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="throw off"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="set in motion"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>motion</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>motion</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="throw out"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="set out"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shake hands"><i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>hands</l><r><g><b/>hands</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="put back"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="overthrow"><i>overthr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="take a nap"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>nap</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>nap</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="split up"><i>split</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bite"><i>b</i><par n="b/ite__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bind"><i>b</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wind"><i>w</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wind up"><i>w</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="wind down"><i>w</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bend"><i>ben</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blow"><i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blow up"><i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="breed"><i>bre</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="build"><i>buil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="build on"><i>buil</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="cut"><i>cut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="find out"><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="find"><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="feed"><i>fe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grow"><i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grow stronger"><i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>stronger</l><r><g><b/>stronger</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="hit"><i>hit</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="know"><i>kn</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="know the way"><i>kn</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>the<b/>way</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>way</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lend"><i>len</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="let"><i>let</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="send in"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="send"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="set"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="set up"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shake"><i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="shut"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e r="LR"><i>spe</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bleed"><i>ble</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bleed to death"><i>ble</i><par n="ble/ed__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>death</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>death</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="spend"><i>spen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="take care"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>care</l><r><g><b/>care</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take effect"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>effect</l><r><g><b/>effect</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take up"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take on"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take part"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>part</l><r><g><b/>part</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take place"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>place</l><r><g><b/>place</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take more"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>more</l><r><g><b/>more</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="take advantage of"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="throw"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="throw away"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="trot"><i>trot</i><par n="cut__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undertake"><i>undert</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
